Hawaii, session 2026, HB2622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the foreign-born population in Hawaii is two hundred sixty thousand and makes up eighteen per cent of the State's total population, which is higher than the fourteen per cent of the population of the United States that is foreign-born.  Immigrants to Hawaii arrive from many countries, including China, Japan, Korea, Mexico, Vietnam, and the Philippines, and contribute billions to the State's economic output by paying taxes, establishing new businesses, and staffing essential jobs.  However, many immigrants are paid below poverty rates and lack access to social benefits. The legislature further finds that around twenty-five per cent of the State's population speak a language other than English at home and over ten per cent have limited English proficiency.  Among these other languages are Ilokano, Tagalog, Japanese, Korean, Spanish, Samoan, Tongan, and Micronesian languages, including Pohnpeian, Marshallese, and Chuukese. Without access to services and resources in these languages, many residents of Hawaii face significant barriers to participation in the community. The legislature further finds that the Hawaii emergency management agency has one language coordinator and needs additional bilingual resources to communicate with residents with limited English proficiency, especially during emergencies.  Additionally, bilingual resources are essential for the state to comply with federal and state mandates, such as the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and Presidential Executive Order 13166 of August 11, 2000, to provide language access as a condition to receive grants, contracts, and other partnerships.  In 2006, the State established the Office of Language Access to affirm its commitment to civil rights and comprehensive access to services regardless of national origin. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to provide the Hawaii emergency management agency with resources to meet the language access needs of residents with limited English proficiency and reaffirm its commitment to civil rights. These resources will increase the Hawaii emergency management agency's capacity to serve immigrants and other residents with limited English proficiency by providing bilingual resources and services. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii emergency management agency to expand access to bilingual resources and services. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii emergency management agency for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________